Hawaii statutes.
[§572-1.8] Interpretation of terminology to
be gender-neutral. When necessary to implement the rights, benefits,
protections, and responsibilities of spouses under the laws of this State, all
gender-specific terminology, such as "husband", "wife",
"widow", "widower", or similar terms, shall be construed in
a gender-neutral manner. This interpretation shall apply to all sources of
law, including statutes, administrative rules, court decisions, common law, or
any other source of law. [L Sp 2013 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next